Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 15A Bone Mass Measurement Coverage

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 877, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“(1) Osteoporosis affects 28 million Americans and each year results in 1.5 million fractures of the hip, spine, wrist, and other bones, costing the nation $14 billion annually; (2) Osteoporosis progresses silently, in many cases undiagnosed until a fracture occurs, and once a fracture occurs, the disease is already advanced, and the likelihood is high that another fracture will occur; (3) One in two women and one in eight men 50 years of age and over will suffer a fracture due to osteoporosis; (4) Since osteoporosis progresses silently and currently has no cure, prevention, early diagnosis, and treatment are key to reducing the prevalence and devastation of this disease; (5) Medical experts agree that osteoporosis is preventable and treatable; however, once the disease progresses to the point of fracture, its associated consequences may lead to disability and institutionalization and may exact a heavy toll on quality of life; (6) Given the current focus on reducing unnecessary health care expenditures through the use of health promotion and disease prevention programs, it is cost effective to make available coverage of services such as bone mass measurement, which will lead to early diagnosis, prevention of fracture, and timely treatment of osteoporosis; (7) Bone mass measurement is a reliable way to detect the presence of low bone mass and to ascertain the extent of bone loss to help assess the individual’s risk for fracture, which aids in selecting appropriate therapies and interventions, while ordinary X-rays are not sensitive enough to detect osteoporosis until 25-40 percent of bone mass has been lost and the disease is advanced; (8) Current available technologies for measuring bone mass or bone loss include single and dual energy X-ray absorptiometry, computed tomography, radiographic absorptiometry, and biochemical markers, and other technologies for determining bone mass or bone loss are under investigation and may become scientifically proven technologies in the future; and (9) Scientifically proven technologies for detecting bone loss and other services related to the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of osteoporosis can be used effectively to reduce the pain and financial burden that osteoporosis inflicts upon its victims.”

31-15A-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Bone Mass Measurement Coverage Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-15A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 877, § 2.

31-15A-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Accident and sickness insurance benefit plan, policy, or contract” has the meaning provided by paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 33-24-28.1, provided that such term shall not include a limited benefit insurance policy as defined in paragraph (4) of subsection (f) of Code Section 33-30-12.

“Bone mass measurement” means a radiologic or radioisotopic procedure or other technologies approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and performed on an individual for the purpose of identifying bone mass or detecting bone loss.

“Qualified individual” means an:

Estrogen-deficient woman or individual at clinical risk of osteoporosis as determined directly or indirectly by a physician and who is considering treatment;

Individual with osteoporotic vertebral abnormalities;

Individual receiving long-term glucocorticoid (steroid) therapy;

Individual with primary hyperparathyroidism; or

Individual being monitored directly or indirectly by a physician to assess the response to or efficacy of approved osteoporosis drug therapies.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-15A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 877, § 2.

31-15A-3.
Insurance benefit plan shall provide coverage for bone mass measurement; education.

Every group or individual accident or sickness insurance benefit plan, policy, or contract that provides hospital, medical, or surgical coverage that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1998, shall make available as a part of the plan, policy, or contract or as an optional endorsement to the plan, policy, or contract coverage for qualified individuals for reimbursement for scientifically proven bone mass measurement (bone density testing) for the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of osteoporosis.

Every person or entity providing an accident or sickness insurance benefit plan, policy, or contract which is subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall identify and use scientifically accurate educational materials to increase patient awareness and knowledge of osteoporosis and encourage the prevention and treatment of osteoporosis.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-15A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 877, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, commas were inserted preceding the phrase “or contract” in two places in subsection (a).